Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska36-811
Governing law.

(a) In this section, the following rules determine a debtor's location:

(1) A debtor who is an individual is located at the individual's principal residence.

(2) A debtor that is an organization and has only one place of business is located at its place of business.

(3) A debtor that is an organization and has more than one place of business is located at its chief executive office.

(b) A claim for relief in the nature of a claim for relief under the Uniform Voidable Transactions Act is governed by the local law of the jurisdiction in which the debtor is located when the transfer is made or the obligation is incurred.

Laws 2019, LB70, § 11.